tests/normal nouns - ending with "vowels".yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "Куба = Cuba":
    Куба<n><nom> : Куба
    Куба<n><acc> : Кубыг
    Куба<n><gen> : Кубын
    Куба<n><abl> : Кубаас
    Куба<n><dat> : Кубад
